Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 6. PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE B. STATE OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 662. HOLIDAYS AND RECOGNITION DAYS, WEEKS, AND MONTHS

SUBCHAPTER A. HOLIDAYS FOR STATE EMPLOYEES

Sec. 662.001. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Part-time state employee" means a state employee who normally works fewer than 40 hours each week.

(2) "State agency" means a unit of state government, including a state board, commission, council, department, committee, agency, or office that was created by the constitution or a statute of this state and is in any branch of state government. The term does not include a local government, a river authority, a special district, any other political subdivision, or an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code.

(3) "State employee" means an employee of a state agency or an appointed officer of a state agency whose office is not created by the state constitution. The term includes a part-time, hourly, or temporary state employee.

(4) "Workday" means a day on which a state employee is normally scheduled to work. The term does not include a national or state holiday.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1035, Sec. 27, eff. June 19, 1997.

Sec. 662.002. APPLICABILITY TO EMPLOYEE OF THE HOUSE OR SENATE. This subchapter applies to a state employee of the house of representatives or the senate only at the discretion of the presiding officer or the administration committee of each respective house.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 662.003. DATES AND DESCRIPTIONS OF HOLIDAYS. (a) A national holiday includes only the following days:

(1) the first day of January, "New Year's Day";

(2) the third Monday in January, "Martin Luther King, Jr., Day" in observance of the birthday of Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr.;

(3) the third Monday in February, "Presidents' Day";

(4) the last Monday in May, "Memorial Day";

(5) the fourth day of July, "Independence Day";

(6) the first Monday in September, "Labor Day";

(7) the 11th day of November, "Veterans Day," dedicated to the cause of world peace and to honoring the veterans of all wars in which Texans and other Americans have fought;

(8) the fourth Thursday in November, "Thanksgiving Day"; and

(9) the 25th day of December, "Christmas Day."

(b) A state holiday includes only the following days:

(1) the 19th day of January, "Confederate Heroes Day," in honor of Jefferson Davis, Robert E. Lee, and other Confederate heroes;

(2) the second day of March, "Texas Independence Day";

(3) the 21st day of April, "San Jacinto Day";

(4) the 19th day of June, "Emancipation Day in Texas," in honor of the emancipation of the slaves in Texas in 1865;

(5) the 27th day of August, "Lyndon Baines Johnson Day," in observance of the birthday of Lyndon Baines Johnson;

(6) the Friday after Thanksgiving Day;

(7) the 24th day of December; and

(8) the 26th day of December.

(c) An "optional holiday" includes only the days on which Rosh Hashanah, Yom Kippur, or Good Friday falls.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 279, Sec. 20, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 662.004. MINIMUM NUMBER OF EMPLOYEES NEEDED TO CONDUCT BUSINESS. (a) A state agency and an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code, shall have enough employees on duty during a state holiday to conduct the public business of the agency or institution.

(b) This section does not apply to a state holiday that falls on a Saturday or Sunday, the Friday after Thanksgiving Day, or the 24th or 26th day of December.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 279, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 662.005. ENTITLEMENT TO PAID DAY OFF. (a) An individual who is a state employee on the last workday before or the first workday after a national or state holiday, or on both workdays, is entitled, except as provided by Section 662.010, to a paid day off from working for a state agency on the holiday if:

(1) the holiday does not fall on a Saturday or Sunday; and

(2) the General Appropriations Act does not prohibit state agencies from observing the holiday.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 109 (S.B. 2214), Sec. 1

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(b) Except as provided by Section 662.010, and notwithstanding Section 659.015 or another law, each of the following state employees who is required to work on a national or state holiday that falls on a Saturday or Sunday is entitled to compensatory time off at the rate of one hour for each hour worked on the holiday:

(1) an employee of the Department of Family and Protective Services in the statewide intake division who receives reports of abuse or neglect;

(2) a peace officer commissioned by a state officer or state agency listed under Article 2.12, Code of Criminal Procedure;

(3) an employee of the Department of Public Safety who:

(A) performs communications or dispatch services related to traffic law enforcement; or

(B) is a public security officer, as that term is defined by Section 1701.001, Occupations Code; or

(4) an employee of the Parks and Wildlife Department who performs communications and dispatch services to assist law enforcement officers commissioned by the Parks and Wildlife Commission in performing law enforcement duties.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(b) Except as provided by Section 662.010, and notwithstanding Section 659.015 or another law, each of the following state employees who is required to work on a national or state holiday that falls on a Saturday or Sunday is entitled to compensatory time off at the rate of one hour for each hour worked on the holiday:

(1) an employee of the Department of Family and Protective Services in the statewide intake division who receives reports of abuse or neglect;

(2) a peace officer commissioned by a state officer or state agency listed under Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure;

(3) an employee of the Department of Public Safety who:

(A) performs communications or dispatch services related to traffic law enforcement; or

(B) is a public security officer, as that term is defined by Section 1701.001, Occupations Code; or

(4) an employee of the Parks and Wildlife Department who performs communications and dispatch services to assist law enforcement officers commissioned by the Parks and Wildlife Commission in performing law enforcement duties.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 950 (S.B. 1727), Sec. 13

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(b) Except as provided by Section 662.010, and notwithstanding Section 659.015 or another law, a state employee who is a peace officer commissioned or appointed, as applicable, by a state officer or state agency listed under Article 2.12, Code of Criminal Procedure, or who is employed by the Department of Public Safety either to perform communications or dispatch services related to traffic law enforcement or as a public security officer, as that term is defined by Section 1701.001, Occupations Code, or who is employed by the Parks and Wildlife Department to perform communications and dispatch services to assist law enforcement officers commissioned by the Parks and Wildlife Commission in performing law enforcement duties, or who is employed by the Texas Juvenile Justice Department to perform communication service duties for the incident reporting center and to assist law enforcement officers appointed by the office of inspector general of the Texas Juvenile Justice Department in performing investigative duties, or who is employed as a security officer providing security and entry searches for secure correctional facilities operated by the Texas Juvenile Justice Department, and who is required to work on a national or state holiday that falls on a Saturday or Sunday is entitled to compensatory time off at the rate of one hour for each hour worked on the holiday.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(b) Except as provided by Section 662.010, and notwithstanding Section 659.015 or another law, a state employee who is a peace officer commissioned or appointed, as applicable, by a state officer or state agency listed under Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure, or who is employed by the Department of Public Safety either to perform communications or dispatch services related to traffic law enforcement or as a public security officer, as that term is defined by Section 1701.001, Occupations Code, or who is employed by the Parks and Wildlife Department to perform communications and dispatch services to assist law enforcement officers commissioned by the Parks and Wildlife Commission in performing law enforcement duties, or who is employed by the Texas Juvenile Justice Department to perform communication service duties for the incident reporting center and to assist law enforcement officers appointed by the office of inspector general of the Texas Juvenile Justice Department in performing investigative duties, or who is employed as a security officer providing security and entry searches for secure correctional facilities operated by the Texas Juvenile Justice Department, and who is required to work on a national or state holiday that falls on a Saturday or Sunday is entitled to compensatory time off at the rate of one hour for each hour worked on the holiday.

(c) In this section, "state employee":

(1) includes an individual who uses paid leave from a state agency; and

(2) does not include an individual who uses unpaid leave from a state agency.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1035, Sec. 28, eff. June 19, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 717, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 459, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 868, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 5.14, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 74 (H.B. 46), Sec. 1, eff. May 19, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 109 (S.B. 2214), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.114, eff. January 1, 2025.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 950 (S.B. 1727), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 662.006. OPTIONAL HOLIDAY. (a) An individual who is a state employee on the last workday before or the first workday after an optional holiday, or on both workdays, is entitled, except as provided by Section 662.010, to a paid day off from working for a state agency on the holiday if:

(1) the holiday does not fall on a Saturday or Sunday;

(2) the employee agrees to give up, during the same fiscal year, a state holiday that:

(A) does not fall on a Saturday or Sunday; and

(B) the General Appropriations Act does not prohibit state agencies from observing; and

(3) the General Appropriations Act does not prohibit state agencies from observing the optional holiday.

(b) A state employee is entitled to a paid day off from working for a state agency on each day of an optional holiday that extends for more than one day if the employee:

(1) qualifies for the paid day off under Subsection (a); and

(2) agrees to give up during the same fiscal year an equivalent number of state holidays that:

(A) do not fall on a Saturday or Sunday; and

(B) the General Appropriations Act does not prohibit state agencies from observing.

(c) A state employee may not agree to give up the Friday after Thanksgiving Day or the 24th or 26th day of December.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1035, Sec. 29, eff. June 19, 1997.

Sec. 662.007. COMPENSATORY TIME. (a) A state employee who is required to work on a national or state holiday is entitled to compensatory time off during the 12 months after the holiday if the state employee is entitled to a paid day off from working for a state agency on the holiday under Section 662.005.

(b) A state employee must give reasonable notice of the employee's intention to use the compensatory time but is not required to say how the compensatory time will be used.

(c) An institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code, may allow an employee who is required to work on a national or state holiday that does not fall on a Saturday or Sunday to take compensatory time off in accordance with this section or may instead pay the employee at the employee's regular rate of pay for that time if the institution determines that allowing compensatory time off would disrupt normal teaching, research, or other critical functions.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1035, Sec. 30, eff. June 19, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 279, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 662.0071. TRANSFERS OF COMPENSATORY TIME BALANCES.

(a) A state agency shall accept the balance of compensatory time accrued under Section 662.007 by a state employee who transfers to that agency from another state agency if the employee transfers as a direct result of the legislature's transfer of legal authority or duties from the agency that formerly employed the employee to the agency that currently employs the employee.

(b) Subsection (a) does not apply if the transferring state employee is required to apply for the new position.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1035, Sec. 46, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 24 (S.B. 706), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 24 (S.B. 706), Sec. 7(3), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 662.0072. TRANSFERRING EMPLOYEE: PAYMENT FOR HOLIDAY. If a state or national holiday occurs between the dates that a state employee separates from one state agency and begins employment with another state agency or an institution of higher education without a break in service, the agency or institution of higher education to which the employee transfers is responsible for paying the employee for the holiday regardless of whether the agency or institution of higher education that receives the new employee recognizes the holiday.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 279, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 662.008. PART-TIME STATE EMPLOYEES. The pay of a part-time state employee for a paid day off to which the employee is entitled under this subchapter must be proportionally reduced to account for the fewer hours the employee normally works.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 662.009. EMPLOYEE WORKING OTHER THAN MONDAY THROUGH FRIDAY. (a) A state employee who normally works 40 hours a week on a schedule other than Monday through Friday is entitled to paid holiday time off during the fiscal year equal to eight hours multiplied by the number of national and state holidays in the fiscal year as determined under Section 662.005.

(b) A state employee to whom Subsection (a) applies who works less than the entire fiscal year is entitled to paid holiday time off during the fiscal year equal to eight hours multiplied by the number of national and state holidays that occur during the period worked by the employee under Section 662.005.

(c) The paid holiday time off of a part-time state employee who works on a schedule other than Monday through Friday must be proportionally reduced to account for the fewer hours the employee normally works.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 662.010. HOLIDAY BEFORE WORK BEGINS OR AFTER WORK ENDS. (a) An individual must be a state employee on the workday before and after a state or national holiday in order to be paid for that holiday, unless the holiday falls on the employee's first or last workday of the month.

(b) In this section, "state employee":

(1) includes an individual who uses paid leave from a state agency; and

(2) does not include an individual who uses unpaid leave from a state agency.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1035, Sec. 31, eff. June 19, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1310, Sec. 47, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 662.011. HOLIDAYS FOR INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION. (a) The governing body of an institution of higher education, as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code, other than a public junior college as defined by that section, may establish the holiday schedule for the institution, subject to any applicable limitation on the observance of holidays prescribed by the General Appropriations Act.

(b) The number of holidays to be observed by the institution may not exceed the number of holidays on which an employee of a state agency is entitled to a day off.

(c) An employee of the institution is eligible to take paid holiday leave only if the employee:

(1) is scheduled to work at least 20 hours per week for a period of at least four and one-half months; and

(2) is not employed in a position for which the employee is required to be a student as a condition of the employment.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 279, Sec. 24, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 662.012. RULES. The comptroller may establish procedures and adopt rules to administer Sections 662.001-662.010.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1035, Sec. 20, eff. June 19, 1997.

Sec. 662.013. OPTIONAL HOLIDAY FOR CESAR CHAVEZ DAY. (a) The 31st day of March shall be designated "Cesar Chavez Day" in observance of the birthday of Cesar Chavez.

(b) The administrative head of a state agency may allow an employee of the agency to have a day off with pay on Cesar Chavez Day in lieu of any other state holiday that occurs on a weekday, other than a weekday on which an election is held throughout the state, on which the state agency is required to be open but on which the operations of the agency are required to be maintained at only a minimum level.

(c) On Cesar Chavez Day, each state agency shall remain open and conduct the operations of the agency at a minimum level.

(d) A holiday allowed under this section is in lieu of another holiday prescribed by law. The total number of holidays in a year to which an employee of a state agency is entitled is not changed by this section.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 521, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER B. LEGAL HOLIDAYS

Sec. 662.021. DATES OF HOLIDAYS. A legal holiday includes only the following days:

(1) a national holiday under Section 662.003(a); and

(2) a state holiday under Sections 662.003(b)(1) through (6).

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 662.022. CLOSURE OF PUBLIC OFFICES. A public office of this state may be closed on a legal holiday, except as provided by Section 662.004.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 662.023. PRESENTMENT, NOTICE OF DISHONOR, AND PROTEST OF CERTAIN COMMERCIAL PAPER. A legal holiday is treated as a Sunday for presenting for payment or acceptance, protesting, and giving notice of the dishonor of a draft or promissory note.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER C. RECOGNITION DAYS

Sec. 662.041. SAM RAYBURN DAY. (a) January 6 is Sam Rayburn Day in memory of that great Texas and American statesman, Sam Rayburn.

(b) Sam Rayburn Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate programs in the public schools and other places to commemorate the birthday of Sam Rayburn.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 662.042. FORMER PRISONERS OF WAR RECOGNITION DAY. (a) April 9 is Former Prisoners of War Recognition Day in honor of the courage of those Americans who suffered sacrifices and tribulations as prisoners of war in the course of their military service on behalf of this nation.

(b) Former Prisoners of War Recognition Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 662.043. INTERNATIONAL TRADE AWARENESS WEEK. (a) May 22 through May 26 is International Trade Awareness Week to encourage Texas businesses to engage effectively in the promotion and development of international trade.

(b) International Trade Awareness Week shall be observed by appropriate ceremonies and activities.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 662.044. COLUMBUS DAY. (a) The second Monday of October is Columbus Day in honor of Christopher Columbus.

(b) Columbus Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies.

(c) Public offices of this state shall remain open on Columbus Day.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 662.045. FATHER OF TEXAS DAY. (a) November 3 is Father of Texas Day in memory of Stephen F. Austin, the great pioneer patriot and the real and true Father of Texas.

(b) Father of Texas Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate and patriotic programs in the public schools and other places to properly commemorate the birthday of Stephen F. Austin and to inspire a greater love for this beloved state.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 662.046. TEXAS PARENTS DAY. The second Sunday in August of each year is Texas Parents Day to celebrate the Texas family and to emphasize the importance of parents taking an active role in the raising and future of their children.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 758, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999.

Sec. 662.047. STATE OF TEXAS ANNIVERSARY REMEMBRANCE DAY (STAR DAY). (a) February 19 is State of Texas Anniversary Remembrance Day (STAR Day) in honor of Texas joining the Union and the day that James Pinckney Henderson became the first governor of the State of Texas in 1846.

(b) State of Texas Anniversary Remembrance Day (STAR Day) shall be regularly observed by appropriate and patriotic programs in the public schools and other places to properly commemorate the annexation of this state and to inspire a greater appreciation for the history of this state.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 502, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999, and Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1453, Sec. 7, eff. Aug. 30, 1999. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 662.046, 662.050 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(58), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 662.048. TEXAS FLAG DAY. Texas Flag Day shall be celebrated each March 2, Texas Independence Day.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 7.103, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 662.049. PUBLIC SCHOOL PARAPROFESSIONAL DAY. (a) The second Wednesday in May of each year is Public School Paraprofessional Day in recognition of education paraprofessionals including teacher assistants, instructional aides, educational trainers, library attendants, bilingual assistants, special education associates, mentors, and tutors.

(b) Public School Paraprofessional Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies and activities in the public schools and other places to properly recognize the paraprofessionals who have made tremendous contributions to the educational process.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 287, Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 2001.

Sec. 662.050. TEXAS FIRST RESPONDERS DAY. (a) September 11 is Texas First Responders Day in honor of the bravery, courage, and determination of Texas men and women who assist others in emergencies.

(b) Texas First Responders Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies in the public schools and other places to honor Texas first responders. Each governmental entity may determine the appropriate ceremonies by which Texas observes Texas First Responders Day.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 614, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1312, Sec. 6, eff. June 21, 2003.

Sec. 662.051. WOMEN'S INDEPENDENCE DAY. (a) August 26 is Women's Independence Day to commemorate the ratification in 1920 of the Nineteenth Amendment to the United States Constitution, which guaranteed women the right to vote.

(b) Women's Independence Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate programs in the public schools and other places to inspire a greater appreciation of the importance of women's suffrage.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 19 (H.B. 67), Sec. 1, eff. May 9, 2005.

Sec. 662.052. TEXIAN NAVY DAY. (a) The third Saturday in September of each year is Texian Navy Day in remembrance of the Texian Navy.

(b) Texian Navy Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies and activities.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 697 (S.B. 318), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 662.051 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(40), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 662.053. VOLUNTEERS FOR DEMOCRACY DAY. (a) The second Tuesday in January of each year is Volunteers for Democracy Day in honor of the precinct chairs and other election volunteers who make valuable contributions to the nation's democratic system.

(b) Volunteers for Democracy Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 393), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 662.054. TEXAS ADOPTION DAY. (a) The Saturday before Thanksgiving Day of each year is Texas Adoption Day to celebrate and encourage adoption, adoptive families, and adoption workers in Texas.

(b) Texas Adoption Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies and activities that encourage participation in and raise awareness about the adoption process and that honor adoptive families and adoption workers in Texas.

(c) The Department of Family and Protective Services shall create a statewide awareness campaign to promote Texas Adoption Day and shall coordinate ceremonies and activities held throughout the state.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 386 (S.B. 640), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 662.053 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(43), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 662.055. DR. HECTOR P. GARCIA DAY. (a) The third Wednesday of September is Dr. Hector P. Garcia Day in memory of the significant contributions to the Mexican American civil rights movement of Dr. Hector P. Garcia, a distinguished physician and a recipient of the Presidential Medal of Freedom and the founder of the American GI Forum, which promotes civil rights protection of Hispanic veterans and all Americans. Dr. Garcia, a World War II hero, was awarded a Bronze Star Medal with six battle stars in recognition of his meritorious service to the United States.

(b) Dr. Hector P. Garcia Day may be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies and activities in the public schools and other places to properly commemorate the importance of the contributions made by Dr. Garcia.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 274 (S.B. 495), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 662.056. AMERICAN INDIAN HERITAGE DAY. (a) The last Friday in September is American Indian Heritage Day in recognition of the historic, cultural, and social contributions American Indian communities and leaders have made to this state.

(b) American Indian Heritage Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies, activities, and programs in the public schools and other places to honor American Indians in this state and to celebrate the rich traditional and contemporary American Indian culture.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 11 (H.B. 174), Sec. 1, eff. May 10, 2013.

Sec. 662.057. TEXAS ARBOR DAY. (a) The first Friday in November of each year is Texas Arbor Day to encourage the planting and cultivation of forest, shade, and ornamental trees throughout the state.

(b) Texas Arbor Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies and activities.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 51 (H.B. 419), Sec. 1, eff. May 18, 2013.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 662.056 by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(27), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 662.058. VIETNAM VETERANS DAY. (a) March 29 is Vietnam Veterans Day in honor of the men and women who served in the Vietnam War on behalf of this nation.

(b) Vietnam Veterans Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 558 (S.B. 1903), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 662.059. INFLUENZA AWARENESS DAY. (a) October 1 is Influenza Awareness Day to raise awareness of the health risks associated with influenza and encourage Texans to take proactive measures to reduce exposure to those risks.

(b) Influenza Awareness Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate programs and activities.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 289 (H.B. 1204), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 662.060. WILLIE VELASQUEZ DAY. (a) May 9 is Willie Velasquez Day in observance of the birthday of William "Willie" Cardenas Velasquez.

(b) Willie Velasquez Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies and activities.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1303 (H.B. 3209), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 662.061. NATIONAL DAY OF THE COWBOY. (a) The fourth Saturday in July of each year is National Day of the Cowboy in recognition of the historic, cultural, and social contributions of the cowboy.

(b) National Day of the Cowboy shall be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies and activities.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 125 (S.B. 1522), Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 2015.

Sec. 662.062. IWO JIMA DAY. (a) February 19 is Iwo Jima Day in memory of the heroism and courage of the men and women of the armed forces of the United States who participated in the successful capture of the island of Iwo Jima beginning February 19, 1945.

(b) Iwo Jima Day may be regularly observed through appropriate activities in public schools and other places.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 618 (S.B. 961), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 662.063. LUNG CANCER AWARENESS DAY. (a) May 24 is Lung Cancer Awareness Day to encourage residents of this state to learn about:

(1) the prevalence of lung cancer;

(2) the statistical risks of developing the disease, including behaviors that increase the risk of developing the disease;

(3) ways to increase early diagnosis and treatment of the disease; and

(4) ways to reduce the prevalence of the disease.

(b) Lung Cancer Awareness Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate programs and activities.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 272 (H.B. 369), Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2015.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 662.061 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(20), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 662.064. GOLD STAR MOTHER'S DAY. (a) The last Sunday in September of each year is Gold Star Mother's Day in recognition of mothers whose sons and daughters died while serving in the United States armed forces.

(b) Gold Star Mother's Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 503 (H.B. 194), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 662.061 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(21), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 662.065. WOMEN VETERANS DAY. (a) June 12 is Women Veterans Day to recognize the role of women in the military forces and to commemorate the sacrifices of and valor displayed by Texas women veterans.

(b) Women Veterans Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate programs and activities.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 579 (S.B. 805), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 662.066. FALLEN LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER DAY. (a) July 7 is Fallen Law Enforcement Officer Day in recognition of the ultimate sacrifice made by Texas law enforcement officers killed in the line of duty.

(b) Fallen Law Enforcement Officer Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 881 (H.B. 3042), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 662.067. LAW ENFORCEMENT APPRECIATION DAY. (a) January 9 is Law Enforcement Appreciation Day.

(b) Law Enforcement Appreciation Day may be regularly observed in public schools and other places. The Texas Education Agency shall develop recommendations for the observation of Law Enforcement Appreciation Day through appropriate activities in the public schools.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 297), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 662.065 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(26), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 662.068. BREAST RECONSTRUCTION AWARENESS DAY. (a) The third Wednesday in October of each year is Breast Reconstruction Awareness Day to promote education, awareness, and access for women considering postmastectomy breast reconstruction.

(b) Breast Reconstruction Awareness Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate programs and activities.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 208), Sec. 1, eff. June 12, 2017.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 662.065 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(27), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 662.069. BRAVE DAY. (a) March 21 is Breast Reconstruction Advocacy and Education Day, or BRAVE Day, to promote breast reconstruction advocacy and education, and the rights and choices women have for prevention of, treatment for, and recovery from breast cancer.

(b) BRAVE Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate programs and activities.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1133 (H.B. 210), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2017.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 662.065 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(28), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 662.070. WAXAHACHIE CHAUTAUQUA DAY. (a) July 26 is Waxahachie Chautauqua Day in recognition of the Waxahachie Chautauqua auditorium and to promote the history of Chautauqua, the role Chautauqua plays in preserving communities, and the educational and cultural opportunities Chautauqua offers through community programs.

(b) Waxahachie Chautauqua Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate programs and activities.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1002 (H.B. 1254), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 662.065 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(29), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 662.071. MILITARY SPOUSE APPRECIATION DAY. (a) May 8 is Military Spouse Appreciation Day to recognize the role of the wives and husbands of the brave individuals who serve in the United States armed forces or state military forces. This day commemorates:

(1) the sacrifices military spouses make during the weeks, months, and years a loved one is away from home protecting our freedom; and

(2) the vital support military spouses provide to veterans returning home from military service.

(b) Military Spouse Appreciation Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate programs and activities coordinated by the Texas Veterans Commission.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 118 (S.B. 1819), Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 2019.

Sec. 662.072. SPACE EXPLORATION DAY. (a) July 20 is Space Exploration Day in honor of the heroes of Apollo 11 and those who continue to pursue innovation and exploration.

(b) Space Exploration Day may be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies and activities.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 879 (H.B. 3084), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 662.071 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(39), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 662.073. TEXAS GIRLS IN STEM DAY. (a) March 1 is designated as Texas Girls in STEM Day to celebrate and encourage the participation of girls in this state in fields related to science, technology, engineering, and mathematics.

(b) Texas Girls in STEM Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies, activities, and programs in public schools, public institutions of higher education, and other places to:

(1) encourage girls in this state to consider career fields in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics; and

(2) celebrate and honor the women of this state who have excelled in those fields.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 890 (H.B. 3435), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 662.071 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(40), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 662.074. TEXAS FIREFIGHTERS DAY. (a) May 4 is Texas Firefighters Day in honor of the bravery, determination, and service of Texas firefighters, many of whom are volunteers.

(b) Texas Firefighters Day may be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies and activities.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 171 (H.B. 1064), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 662.071 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(41), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 662.075. SEXUAL ASSAULT SURVIVORS DAY. (a) January 28 is Sexual Assault Survivors Day to bring awareness to the issue of sexual assault and to recognize the courage of survivors throughout this state.

(b) Sexual Assault Survivors Day may be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies and activities.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 193 (H.B. 2298), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 662.071 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(42), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 662.076. DIFFUSE INTRINSIC PONTINE GLIOMA AWARENESS DAY. (a) May 17 is Diffuse Intrinsic Pontine Glioma Awareness Day to raise awareness about the prevalence and deadliness of diffuse intrinsic pontine glioma, a pediatric brain tumor.

(b) Diffuse Intrinsic Pontine Glioma Awareness Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate programs and activities.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 202 (H.B. 2597), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 662.071 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(43), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 662.077. MASTER SERGEANT JONATHAN J. DUNBAR DAY. (a) March 30 is Master Sergeant Jonathan J. Dunbar Day in honor of Master Sergeant Jonathan J. Dunbar, who served in the United States Army and gave his life in defense of this nation.

(b) Master Sergeant Jonathan J. Dunbar Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 354 (H.B. 295), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 662.071 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(44), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 662.078. BLUE TIE DAY. (a) June 13 is Blue Tie Day to promote men's health awareness and encourage men to live healthier, longer lives through early detection and treatment of common diseases.

(b) Blue Tie Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies and activities.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 421 (S.B. 430), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 662.071 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(45), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 662.079. INTERNATIONAL HOLOCAUST REMEMBRANCE DAY. (a) January 27 is International Holocaust Remembrance Day to commemorate the anniversary of the liberation of Auschwitz-Birkenau and to honor the millions of victims of the Holocaust.

(b) International Holocaust Remembrance Day may be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies and activities.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 825 (H.B. 2728), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 662.080. VICTIMS OF COMMUNISM DAY. (a) November 7 is Victims of Communism Day in memory of the more than 100 million people who died and countless others who suffered under communist regimes.

(b) Victims of Communism Day may be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies and activities.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 139 (H.B. 1057), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 12 (S.B. 464), Sec. 2

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1141 (S.B. 739), Sec. 1, see other Sec. 662.081.

Sec. 662.081. ENTREPRENEURS WITH DISABILITIES DAY. (a) October 17 is Entrepreneurs with Disabilities Day to recognize entrepreneurship as a career path for all people with disabilities and bring awareness and inclusion to every aspect of the workforce.

(b) Entrepreneurs with Disabilities Day may be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies, activities, and programs.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 12 (S.B. 464), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1141 (S.B. 739), Sec. 1

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 12 (S.B. 464), Sec. 2, see other Sec. 662.081.

Sec. 662.081. SUPPORTIVE PALLIATIVE CARE AWARENESS DAY. (a) October 10 is Supportive Palliative Care Awareness Day to raise awareness about supportive palliative care optimizing the quality of life for seriously ill patients and their families.

(b) Supportive Palliative Care Awareness Day may be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies and activities.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1141 (S.B. 739), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 662.082. VANESSA GUILLÉN DAY. (a) September 30 is Vanessa Guillén Day in memory of the life and tragic death of Vanessa Guillén and to increase awareness of and the military's response to missing persons, sexual assault, and sexual harassment cases for service members.

(b) Vanessa Guillén Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate programs and activities.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 449 (H.B. 2248), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 662.083. BUDDY CHECK DAY. (a) The 11th day of each month is Buddy Check Day to encourage veterans to contact other veterans, including those with whom they served, who may need assistance.

(b) Buddy Check Day may be regularly observed by appropriate programs and activities coordinated by the Texas Veterans Commission to promote assistance and other services available to veterans and promote education and awareness of issues facing veterans.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 177 (S.B. 460), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 662.084. ROSA PARKS DAY. (a) December 1 is Rosa Parks Day in honor of Rosa Louise McCauley Parks for her courageous act of refusing to give up her seat on a Montgomery, Alabama, bus to protest segregation which helped launch the civil rights movement in the United States.

(b) Rosa Parks Day may be regularly observed by appropriate programs and activities.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 490 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 505 (H.B. 2499), Sec. 1

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 900 (H.B. 2166), Sec. 1, see other Sec. 662.085.

Sec. 662.085. SPECIAL FORCES DAY. (a) June 28 is Special Forces Day in honor of the men and women who have served in the special operations forces of the United States armed forces.

(b) Special Forces Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 505 (H.B. 2499), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 900 (H.B. 2166), Sec. 1

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 505 (H.B. 2499), Sec. 1, see other Sec. 662.085.

Sec. 662.085. COVID-19 HEROES AND MEMORIAL DAY. (a) March 4 is COVID-19 Heroes and Memorial Day in honor of people who lost their lives to COVID-19 and in honor of health care workers, first responders, and other essential workers who kept working during the COVID-19 pandemic so the public could stay safe.

(b) COVID-19 Heroes and Memorial Day shall be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies and activities.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 900 (H.B. 2166), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER D. RECOGNITION MONTHS

Sec. 662.101. BUFFALO SOLDIERS HERITAGE MONTH. (a) July is Buffalo Soldiers Heritage Month in honor of the bravery and dedication of Texas' Buffalo Soldiers and in recognition of their contribution to the legendary history of the Lone Star State.

(b) Buffalo Soldiers Heritage Month shall be regularly observed by appropriate ceremonies and activities.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 478, Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 1999.

Sec. 662.102. TEXAS HISTORY MONTH. (a) March is Texas History Month in honor of those Texans who helped shape the history of the State of Texas and in recognition of events throughout Texas' history.

(b) Texas History Month shall be regularly observed by appropriate celebrations and activities in public schools and other places to promote interest in and knowledge of Texas history.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 423, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 662.103. TEXAS FRUIT AND VEGETABLE MONTH. (a) April is Texas Fruit and Vegetable Month to promote awareness of the health benefits of fruits and vegetables and to encourage Texans to consume more fruits and vegetables.

(b) Texas Fruit and Vegetable Month shall be regularly observed by appropriate celebrations and activities.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 377 (S.B. 555), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 662.104. LUNG CANCER AWARENESS MONTH. (a) November is Lung Cancer Awareness Month to increase awareness of lung cancer and encourage funding of research and more effective treatments.

(b) Lung Cancer Awareness Month may be regularly observed by appropriate activities in public schools and other places to increase the awareness of lung cancer and support for lung cancer research.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 224 (H.B. 1449), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 662.105. CHILD SAFETY MONTH. (a) April is Child Safety Month in recognition of the children of this state as this state's most precious resource. By establishing April as Child Safety Month, this state seeks to ensure that the children of this state grow up in a safe and supportive environment by promoting their protection and care through increased public awareness of:

(1) ways to reduce accidental injury and death through the use of bicycle helmets, seat belts, safety and booster seats, and smoke alarms; and

(2) the dangers presented to children by unattended and unlocked vehicles and by being left in closed vehicles during hot or sunny weather.

(b) Child Safety Month may be regularly observed by appropriate celebrations and activities in public schools and other places to promote the protection and care of children in this state.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 651 (H.B. 1045), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 662.103 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(44), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 662.106. HYDROCEPHALUS AWARENESS MONTH. (a) September is Hydrocephalus Awareness Month to:

(1) increase public awareness of hydrocephalus, a serious neurological condition characterized by the abnormal buildup of cerebrospinal fluids in the ventricles of the brain; and

(2) encourage the development of partnerships between the federal government, health care professionals, and patient advocacy groups to advance the public's understanding of the condition, improve the diagnosis and treatment of the condition, and support research for a cure.

(b) Hydrocephalus Awareness Month shall be regularly observed by appropriate activities in public schools and other places to increase awareness of hydrocephalus.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 966 (H.B. 3597), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 285 (H.B. 1052), Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2015.

Sec. 662.107. HUMAN TRAFFICKING PREVENTION MONTH. (a) January is Human Trafficking Prevention Month to increase awareness of human trafficking in an effort to encourage people to alert authorities to any suspected incidents involving human trafficking.

(b) Human Trafficking Prevention Month may be regularly observed through appropriate activities in public schools and other places to increase awareness and prevention of human trafficking.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 2290), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 662.108. MINORITY CANCER AWARENESS MONTH. (a) April is Minority Cancer Awareness Month to increase awareness of cancer in minority populations and encourage funding of education and earlier and more effective diagnosis and treatment of cancer.

(b) Minority Cancer Awareness Month shall be regularly observed by appropriate activities in public locations to increase cancer awareness, including the specific effects, incidences, and impact of cancer on minority populations, and encourage support for minority cancer education, diagnosis, treatment, and prevention.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 202 (H.B. 114), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 662.109. PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES HISTORY AND AWARENESS MONTH. (a) October is Persons with Disabilities History and Awareness Month to:

(1) increase public awareness of the many achievements of people with disabilities;

(2) encourage public understanding of the disability rights movement; and

(3) reaffirm the local, state, and federal commitment to providing equality and inclusion for people with disabilities.

(b) Persons with Disabilities History and Awareness Month shall be regularly observed by appropriate celebration and activities to promote respect for and better treatment of people with disabilities in this state.

(c) Each public school may:

(1) elect to observe Persons with Disabilities History and Awareness Month; and

(2) determine the appropriate activities by which the school observes Persons with Disabilities History and Awareness Month.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 582 (H.B. 3616), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 662.110. POSTPARTUM DEPRESSION AWARENESS MONTH. (a) May is Postpartum Depression Awareness Month to increase awareness of postpartum depression and to encourage:

(1) the identification of signs, symptoms, and treatment options for postpartum depression;

(2) the creation and update of lists of recommended materials for perinatal mental health available through the Department of State Health Services and the Health and Human Services Commission;

(3) electronic circulation of and posting on state and local agency websites of recommended postpartum depression resources;

(4) mothers-to-be and new mothers to be screened for postpartum depression using validated survey instruments; and

(5) collaboration between governmental agencies, educational institutions, hospitals, private health care practices, health insurance providers, Medicaid providers, and mental health agencies to increase awareness of postpartum affective illness.

(b) Postpartum Depression Awareness Month shall be regularly observed through appropriate programs and activities to increase awareness of postpartum depression.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 552 (H.B. 2079), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 662.111. SEXUAL ASSAULT AWARENESS MONTH. (a) April is Sexual Assault Awareness Month to increase awareness and prevention of sexual assault.

(b) Sexual Assault Awareness Month may be regularly observed through appropriate activities in public schools and other places to increase awareness and prevention of sexual assault.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 984 (H.B. 822), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 662.112. BLEEDING DISORDERS AWARENESS MONTH. (a) March is Bleeding Disorders Awareness Month to increase awareness of genetic disorders that prevent a person's blood from clotting properly and to encourage:

(1) research for treatments and cures of bleeding disorders; and

(2) advocacy on behalf of persons with bleeding disorders.

(b) Bleeding Disorders Awareness Month may be regularly observed through appropriate activities in communities to increase awareness of bleeding disorders.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 180 (H.B. 1508), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 662.113. NEONATAL ABSTINENCE SYNDROME AWARENESS MONTH. June is Neonatal Abstinence Syndrome Awareness Month to increase awareness of neonatal abstinence syndrome and to encourage:

(1) awareness of the dangers of opioid and substance abuse during pregnancy to prevent neonatal abstinence syndrome;

(2) the creation and update of lists of recommended materials to address neonatal abstinence syndrome available through the Department of State Health Services and the Health and Human Services Commission;

(3) electronic circulation of and posting on state and local agency websites of recommended treatment and recovery resources;

(4) the availability of resources for mothers-to-be and new mothers with substance abuse disorders, including health care services and recovery support services; and

(5) collaboration between state and federal governmental agencies, hospitals, private health care practices, health insurance providers, Medicaid providers, and mental health agencies to increase awareness.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 160 (H.B. 405), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 662.112 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(46), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 662.114. UTERINE FIBROIDS AWARENESS MONTH. (a) July is Uterine Fibroids Awareness Month to increase awareness of uterine fibroids and to:

(1) encourage education and research on uterine fibroids;

(2) improve methods for identifying signs and symptoms of uterine fibroids;

(3) improve methods for preventing, diagnosing, and treating uterine fibroids; and

(4) encourage the establishment of a public education campaign that includes health seminars, medical information panels, community programs, and funding opportunities.

(b) Uterine Fibroids Awareness Month shall be regularly observed through appropriate programs and activities to increase awareness of uterine fibroids.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 1966), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 662.115. MENTAL HEALTH CONDITION AND SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER PARITY AWARENESS MONTH. (a) October is Mental Health Condition and Substance Use Disorder Parity Awareness Month to increase awareness of and compliance with state and federal rules, regulations, and statutes concerning the availability of, and terms and conditions of, benefits for mental health conditions and substance use disorders.

(b) Mental Health Condition and Substance Use Disorder Parity Awareness Month may be regularly observed through appropriate activities in communities to increase awareness of and education on the available benefits for mental health conditions and substance use disorders.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 703 (H.B. 2595), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 662.116. FENTANYL POISONING AWARENESS MONTH. (a) October is Fentanyl Poisoning Awareness Month to increase awareness of the dangers of fentanyl and potential overdoses.

(b) Fentanyl Poisoning Awareness Month may be regularly observed through appropriate activities in communities to increase awareness of the dangers of fentanyl and potential overdoses.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 914 (H.B. 3144), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER E. RECOGNITION WEEKS

Sec. 662.151. TRANSPORTATION WEEK. The week that includes the third Friday in May is Transportation Week in recognition of National Transportation Week and the contributions of the transportation industry to the State of Texas.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 462, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 662.152. OBESITY AWARENESS WEEK. The second full week in September is obesity awareness week to raise awareness of the health risks associated with obesity and to encourage Texans to achieve and maintain a healthy lifestyle.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1063 (H.B. 2313), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 662.153. MONARCH BUTTERFLY WEEK. (a) The first seven days of October are Monarch Butterfly Week to encourage Texas residents and visitors to study, observe, and promote the life of the state insect, the monarch butterfly.

(b) Through participation in the Texas Monarch Watch program sponsored by the Parks and Wildlife Department, Texas residents and visitors may help scientists answer research questions about monarch biology and migration.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 501 (S.B. 909), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 662.154. TEXAS NATIVE PLANT WEEK. (a) The third full week in October is Texas Native Plant Week to celebrate the native plants of Texas.

(b) Texas Native Plant Week may be regularly observed in public schools and other places with programs to appreciate, explore, and study Texas native plants.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1403 (H.B. 1739), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 662.155. JURY APPRECIATION WEEK. The first seven days in May are Jury Appreciation Week in recognition of the outstanding and important contributions made by Texas citizens who serve as jurors.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 605 (S.B. 565), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Sec. 662.156. DIRECT SUPPORT PROFESSIONALS WEEK. The second full week in September is Direct Support Professionals Week to honor the work of direct support professionals as an integral part of the long-term support system for individuals with physical and mental disabilities.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 686 (H.B. 504), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2015.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 662.155 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(22), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 662.157. VETERINARY TECHNICIAN WEEK. The week that includes the third Saturday in October is Veterinary Technician Week in recognition of the critical role veterinary technicians play in the day-to-day functions of veterinary practices and for their vital role in preserving animal health and welfare.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 199 (H.B. 2471), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.